Vermont, session 2025-2026, H425.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. REGIONAL LONG-TERM SEPTAGE, SLUDGE, AND SOLIDS
MANAGEMENT PLAN
(a) As used in this section:
VT LEG #380946 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.425
2025 Page 2 of 4
(1) “Biosolids” means septage or sewage sludge derived, in whole or in
part, from domestic wastes that have been subjected to a treatment process for
the reduction of pathogens and have been demonstrated to meet the applicable
requirements in Agency rules for vector attraction reduction and pathogen
reduction.
(2) “Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances” or “PFAS” means a
class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated
carbon atom.
(3) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources.
(4) “Septage” means the liquid and solid materials pumped from a septic
tank, portable toilet, or cesspool during cleaning.
(5) “Sludge” means any solid, semisolid, or liquid generated from a
municipal, commercial, or industrial wastewater treatment facility or process,
water supply treatment plant, air pollution control facility, or any other such
waste having similar characteristics and effects. “Sludge” includes Class A
and Class B sewage sludge as those terms are defined under 40 C.F.R. Part
503.
(6) “Wastewater treatment facility” has the same meaning as in section
1295 of this title.
(b) On or before January 15, 2025, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
submit to the House Committee on Environment and the Senate Committee on
VT LEG #380946 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.425
2025 Page 3 of 4
Natural Resources and Energy a proposed a regional long-term septage,
sludge, and solids management plan for the safe and cost-effective disposition
of septage, sludge, and biosolids in a manner that eliminates or reduced
environmental and public health risks. The plan shall:
(1) propose how to establish multimunicipality member districts or
utilities for the regional management of septage, sludge, or biosolids;
(2) identify, assess, and designate existing wastewater treatment
facilities in the State for the purpose of serving as a regional acceptance site for
septage, sludge, and biosolids, while preserving the ability of each facility to
serve the municipality in which it is located;
(3) identify administrative burdens, cost, capacity, or other barriers that
may limit the ability to operate a regional acceptance site and proposed
methods to address each identified barrier;
(4) propose how to preserve the ability of wastewater treatment facilities
to support wastewater projects by villages or municipalities without a facility
through continued acceptance of septage;
(5) how to facilitate intermunicipal agreements for the operation and use
of regional acceptance sites, including how costs to operate, maintain, upgrade,
or construct a regional facility can be shared across participating towns;
VT LEG #380946 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.425
2025 Page 4 of 4
(6) assess and support options for the management of the outputs of
regional acceptance sites in order to ensure beneficial or value-added end use,
including whether:
(A) entering public-private partnerships for certain wastes or outputs
would benefit the operation of regional acceptance sites; and
(B) outputs could be utilized for resource recovery;
(7) propose how regional acceptance facilities would manage the
acceptance and disposition of septage, sludge, or biosolids containing
contaminants of concern, such as PFAS; and
(8) propose regional acceptance sites could charge for services,
including potential rate formulas, taxes, fees, or incentives.
(c) Prior to submitting the plan to the General Assembly under subsection
(b) of this section, the Secretary shall provide public notice of the proposed
plan and shall take public comment for a period of not less than 30 days.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380946 v.1